Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-807
Property damage assessments; appeal; exclusive remedy; effect.

In all cases of damage arising under the provisions of sections 14-101 to 14-2004, the party or parties whose property is damaged or sought to be taken by the provisions of such sections shall have the right to appeal from such assessment of damages, but such appeal shall not delay the appropriation of the property sought to be taken, delay the improvement proposed, or retard the change of grade sought to be made. In no case shall a city of the metropolitan class be liable for the costs or interest on such appeal, unless the party appealing shall be adjudged entitled, upon the appeal, to a greater amount of damage than was awarded. The remedy by appeal allowed by this section shall be exclusive.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. VII, § 7, p. 510;

C.S.1922, § 3715;

C.S.1929, § 14-807;

R.S.1943, § 14-807;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 228.
July 21, 2022
Owner failing to appeal from special assessment is estopped to question same unless council without jurisdiction. Burkley v. City of Omaha, 102 Neb. 308, 167 N.W. 72 (1918).

It is necessary to the taking of an appeal that petition be filed in the district court within thirty days after the final order of the council assessing damages. Creighton University v. City of Omaha, 91 Neb. 486, 136 N.W. 829 (1912).

Damages need not be definitely fixed and ascertained before the appropriation of property, as act expressly provides that appeal shall not delay the taking, and until the appeal is determined, the amount of damages involved is a matter of conjecture. City of Omaha v. State ex rel. Metzger, 69 Neb. 29, 94 N.W. 979 (1903).